Florida, session 2026, HB601.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 925.13, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
925.13 Jurisdiction; virtual currency transactions.—For
the jurisdictional purposes of courts and law enforcement
agencies of this state, a virtual currency or bank account into
which currency or virtual currency from a transaction
originating in this state is traced is deemed to be located in
the county in this state where the transaction originated or in
any county in this state where any act or acts subjecting such
currency or virtual currency to a claim under the laws of this
state occurred.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb601-00